Utah statutes.
17B-2a-824.   Property acquired on behalf of a public transit district.

(1)  Title to property acquired on behalf of a public transit district under this part immediately and by operation of law vests in the public transit district.

(2)  Property described in Subsection (1) is dedicated and set apart for the purposes set forth in this part.

